Massachusetts, session 194th, S169.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 18A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “committed”, in line 10, the
following sentence:-
Physical health and mental health services shall meet or exceed current pediatric
community level standards of care, such as set by the American Academy of Pediatrics, which
shall include, but not be limited to, preventative health care, health promotion, and continuity of
health care provided before and after release.
SECTION 2. Section 6 of said chapter 18A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “counselor program”, in line 6,
the following sentence:-
of 2

It shall further be responsible for monitoring and enforcement of physical and mental
health care contracts to improve medical care access and quality for children in the care and
custody of the department.
of 2